Illinois, session 104th, HB5183.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Landlord and Tenant Act is amended by 5adding Section 35 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 705/35 new)7    Sec. 35. Pet fees; pet rent.8    (a) Definitions. As used in this Section:9    "Pet fee or pet deposit" means any nonrecurring, 10refundable fee or charge paid at the beginning of a tenancy for 11the purpose of maintaining a pet in a dwelling unit during the 12period of tenancy.13    "Pet rent" means any recurring, nonrefundable fee or 14charge paid during the tenancy for the purpose of maintaining 15a pet in a dwelling unit.16    (b) A landlord may charge a tenant either:17        (1) a pet fee or pet deposit; or18        (2) pet rent.19    (c) Pet rent may not exceed 1% of the tenant's monthly rent 20or $35, whichever is less.21    (d) A pet fee or pet deposit is refundable and may not 22exceed 15% of the tenant's monthly rent or $350, whichever is 23less. The pet fee or pet deposit is considered part of the   HB5183- 2 -LRB104 18906 JRC 32351 b1security deposit for purposes of the Landlord and Tenant Act 2and the Security Deposit Return Act.3    (e) A landlord who violates this Section is guilty of an 4unlawful practice under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive 5Business Practices Act.6    (f) This Section applies to leases or agreements executed 7after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 8General Assembly. 9    Section 10. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 10Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 11    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)12    Sec. 2MMMM. Pet fees and pet rent. A person who violates 13the pet fees and pet rent provisions of the Landlord and Tenant 14Act commits an unlawful practice within the meaning of this 15Act.